src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-nipâw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - nipâw : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: ninipân
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kinipân
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: nipâw

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-nipâyân
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-nipâyan, î-nipâyin]
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-nipât

      # Imp
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nipâ
      

      # Prs # Ind
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: ninipân
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kinipân
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: nipâw
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: ninipânân
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kinipânaw, kinipânânaw]
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kinipânâwâw
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: nipâwak
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: nipâthiwa
      nipâw+V+AI+Ind+X: [nipâniwiw, nipâniwan]
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-nipâyân
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-nipâyan, î-nipâyin]
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-nipât
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-nipâyâhk
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-nipâyahk
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-nipâyîk
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-nipâcik, î-nipâtwâw]
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-nipâthit
      PV/î+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-nipâniwik, î-nipâniwahk, î-nipâhk]
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-nipân
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-nipân
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kî-nipâw
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-nipânân
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-nipânaw, kikî-nipânânaw]
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-nipânâwâw
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: kî-nipâwak
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-nipâthiwa
      PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+X: [kî-nipâniwiw, kî-nipâniwan]
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-nipâyân
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-nipâyan, î-kî-nipâyin]
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-nipât
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-nipâyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-nipâyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-nipâyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kî-nipâcik, î-kî-nipâtwâw]
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-nipâthit
      PV/î+PV/ki+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-nipâniwik, î-kî-nipâniwahk, î-kî-nipâhk]
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-nipân
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-nipân
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wî-nipâw
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-nipânân
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-nipânaw, kiwî-nipânânaw]
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-nipânâwâw
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wî-nipâwak
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-nipâthiwa
      PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+X: [wî-nipâniwiw, wî-nipâniwan]
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-nipâyân
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-nipâyan, î-wî-nipâyin]
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-nipât
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-nipâyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-nipâyahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-nipâyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-wî-nipâcik, î-wî-nipâtwâw]
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-nipâthit
      PV/î+PV/wi+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-nipâniwik, î-wî-nipâniwahk, î-wî-nipâhk]
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nika-nipân
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kika-nipân
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: ka-nipâw
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nika-nipânân
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-nipânaw, kika-nipânânaw]
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kika-nipânâwâw
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: ka-nipâwak
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-nipâthiwa
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+X: [ka-nipâniwiw, ka-nipâniwan]
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-nipâyân
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-nipâyan, ka-nipâyin]
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-nipât
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-nipâyâhk
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-nipâyahk
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-nipâyîk
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ka-nipâcik, ka-nipâtwâw]
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-nipâthit
      PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ka-nipâniwik, ka-nipâniwahk, ka-nipâhk]
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-nipâyân
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-nipâyan, ta-nipâyin]
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-nipât
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-nipâyâhk
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-nipâyahk
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-nipâyîk
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ta-nipâcik, ta-nipâtwâw]
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-nipâthit
      PV/ta+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ta-nipâniwik, ta-nipâniwahk, ta-nipâhk]
      

      # Fut # Cond
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: nipâyâni
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [nipâyani, nipâyini]
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: nipâci
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: nipâyâhki
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: nipâyahki
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: nipâyîko
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: nipâtwâwi
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nipâthici
      nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+X: [nipâhki, nipâhkwâwi]
      

      # Imp # Imm
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nipâ
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nipâtân
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nipâk
      

      # Imp # Del
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: nipâhkan
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: nipâhkahk
      nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: nipâhkîk
      
